Washington statutes.
RCW 43.190.070

Referral procedures—Action on complaints.

(1) The office of the state long-term care ombuds shall develop referral procedures for all long-term care ombuds programs to refer any complaint to any appropriate state or local government agency. The department of social and health services shall act as quickly as possible on any complaint referred to them by a long-term care ombuds.

(2) The department of social and health services shall respond to any complaint against a long-term care facility which was referred to it by a long-term care ombuds and shall forward to that ombuds a summary of the results of the investigation and action proposed or taken.

[ 2013 c 23 s 94; 1983 c 290 s 7.]